Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 2 COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL SALES OR USE TAX
29-2-106. Collection - administration - enforcement.

The collection, administration, and enforcement of any countywide or any city or town sales tax adopted pursuant to this article shall be performed by the executive director of the department of revenue in the same manner as the collection, administration, and enforcement of the Colorado state sales tax. Unless otherwise provided in this article, the provisions of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S., shall govern the collection, administration, and enforcement of sales taxes authorized under this article. In collecting, administering, and enforcing a sales tax authorized under this article, the state sales tax authorized under part 1 of article 26 of title 39, C.R.S., or any other sales tax imposed within the boundaries of a county, the executive director of the department of revenue may enter into an intergovernmental agreement with a county pursuant to the provisions of section 39-26-122.5, C.R.S., to enhance systemic efficiencies in the collection of such taxes.

The effective date of any countywide sales tax or city or town sales tax adopted under the provisions of this article shall be either January 1 or July 1 following the date of the election in which such county sales tax proposal is approved; and notice of the adoption of any county sales tax proposal shall be submitted by the county clerk and recorder or by the clerk of the city council or board of trustees of a city or town to the executive director of the department of revenue at least forty-five days prior to the effective date of such tax. If such a sales tax proposal is approved at an election held less than forty-five days prior to the January 1 or July 1 following the date of election, such tax shall not be effective until the next succeeding January 1 or July 1.

The executive director of the department of revenue shall, at no charge, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), administer, collect, and distribute any sales tax imposed in conformity with this article. The executive director shall make monthly distributions of sales tax collections to the appropriate official in each county and in each incorporated city or town in the amount determined under the distribution formula established in accordance with this article. Except as provided in section 39-26-208, C.R.S., any use tax imposed pursuant to section 29-2-109 shall be collected, administered, and enforced by the city, town, or county as provided by ordinance or resolution.

The executive director is hereby authorized to contract and enter into agreements with the county clerk and recorder and municipalities for the collection of state, county, and city or town use taxes upon motor vehicles, and the county clerk and recorder may charge and retain a fee as the director may approve to fully cover the cost of such collection by the county clerk and recorder.

A qualified purchaser may provide a direct payment permit number issued pursuant to section 39-26-103.5, C.R.S., to any vendor or retailer that is liable and responsible for collecting and remitting any countywide sales tax or city or town sales tax imposed on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to the provisions of this article. A vendor or retailer that has received in good faith from a qualified purchaser a direct payment permit number shall not be liable or responsible for collection and remittance of any sales tax imposed on such sale that is paid for directly from such qualified purchaser's funds and not the personal funds of any individual.

A qualified purchaser that provides a direct payment permit number to a vendor or retailer shall be liable and responsible for the amount of sales tax imposed on any sale made to the qualified purchaser pursuant to this article in the same manner as liability would be imposed on a qualified purchaser for state sales tax pursuant to section 39-26-105 (5).

The executive director of the department of revenue shall, at no charge, administer, collect, and distribute the sales tax of any home rule municipality upon request of the governing body of such municipality:
(4) (a) (I) The executive director of the department of revenue shall, at no charge, administer, collect, and distribute the sales tax of any home rule municipality upon request of the governing body of such municipality:

If the provisions of the sales tax ordinance of said municipality, other than those provisions relating to local procedures followed in adopting the ordinance, correspond to the requirements of this article for sales taxes imposed by counties, towns, and cities;

If no use tax is to be collected by the department of revenue except as provided in section 39-26-208, C.R.S.; and

Whether or not the ordinance applies the sales tax to the exemptions listed in section 29-2-105 (1)(d)(I).

When the governing body of any home rule municipality requests the department of revenue to administer, collect, and distribute the sales tax of said municipality as specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), said governing body shall certify to the executive director of the department a true copy of the home rule municipality's sales tax ordinance.

The executive director of the department of revenue shall furnish the governing body of each municipality and county a monthly listing of all returns filed by the retailers in such municipality or county. The governing body of such municipality or county shall notify the executive director of the department of revenue of any retailers omitted from this listing as soon as practicable, but in no event more than one hundred eighty days after receiving said monthly listing. Failure of the governing body of such municipality or county to notify the executive director of the department of revenue of any omitted retailers, within such period, shall preclude the municipality or county from making any further claims based upon such omissions. Neither the executive director of the department of revenue nor any municipality or county shall be held liable for any omissions which have not been called to the executive director's attention within this period.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 39-21-113, the executive director of the department of revenue shall report monthly to each municipality and county for which the department of revenue collects a sales tax information identifying licensed vendors within the municipality or county, including the licensing information required by section 39-26-802.9 (3), and, where the chief administrative officer or his designee has executed a memorandum of understanding with the department of revenue providing for control of confidential data, the status of each vendor's account including the amount of such municipality's or county's sales tax collected and paid by each such vendor. The executive director of the department may, in his discretion, provide additional information to a municipality or county concerning collection and administration of such municipality's or county's sales tax if such a memorandum has been executed.

Except in accordance with judicial order or as otherwise provided by law, no official or employee of a municipality or county receiving sales tax information from the department of revenue pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall divulge or make known to any person not an official or employee of such municipality or county any information which identifies or permits the identification of the amount of sales taxes collected or paid by any individual licensed vendor. The municipal or county officials or employees charged with the custody of such sales tax information shall not be required to produce any such information in any action or proceeding in any court except in an action or proceeding under the provisions of this article to which the municipality or county having custody of the information is a party, in which event the court may require the production of, and may admit in evidence, so much of said sales tax information as is pertinent to the action or proceeding. Any municipal or county official or employee who willfully violates any of the provisions of this paragraph (c) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars and shall be dismissed from office.

The executive director of the department of revenue may promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this article.

The executive director of the department of revenue may, in the executive director's discretion, exchange information with the proper official of any home rule city that imposes a sales and use tax relative to gross sales reported, changes in gross sales resulting from audits, and other information concerning licensed vendors making retail sales within the jurisdiction of the home rule city, including the licensing information required by section 39-26-802.9 (3).

For the purpose of the administration by the state of the provisions of this article, as well as any other state or federal program, each county, home rule county, statutory town or city, home rule town or city, city and county, or territorial charter town or city shall file, pursuant to section 29-2-110, with the executive director of the department of revenue a copy of each sales or use tax ordinance or resolution, or any amendment thereto, no later than ten days after the effective date thereof. A copy of any sales or use tax ordinance or resolution in effect on March 11, 1982, shall be filed no later than July 1, 1982. The failure to file a copy of any such ordinance or resolution shall not give rise to any claim for refund by any taxpayer, other than for overpayment which is determined to be allowable under such ordinance or resolution.

Uniform collection procedures. Each home rule city, town, and city and county shall follow, and conform its ordinances where necessary to, the statute of limitations applicable to the enforcement of state sales and use tax collections, the statute of limitations applicable to refunds of state sales and use taxes, the amount of penalties and interest payable on delinquent remittances of state sales and use taxes, and the posting of bonds pursuant to section 39-21-105, C.R.S.

Standard sales and use tax reporting form.

The executive director of the department of revenue shall adopt, by regulation, a standard municipal sales and use tax reporting form. Such form shall be separate from the state form and shall be the only sales and use tax reporting form required to be used by any person collecting the sales or use tax of any home rule city, town, or city and county which collects its own sales or use tax.

Such form shall be designed so as to permit reporting of variations in base, rate, and vendor's fee, and shall contain adequate location coding and use tax remittance items. Prior to the adoption of and any revision to the form, each home rule city, town, and city and county which collects its own sales tax shall be given the opportunity to comment on the proposed form or revision to the form.

Such standard form and any subsequent revisions shall be used by each home rule city, town, and city and county which collects its own sales tax by the first full month commencing one hundred twenty days after the effective date of the regulation adopting or revising the standard form.

In addition to the standard municipal sales and use tax form set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (9), on or before December 1, 1994, the executive director of the department of revenue shall cooperate with and assist local governments in the development of a common local sales and use tax form. For purposes of this paragraph (d), "local government" means a city, home rule city, town, city and county, or other political subdivision of the state which collects its own sales or use tax.

The common local sales and use tax form shall:

Allow a person collecting the sales and use tax of any local government to report all sales and use taxes collected for a local government on the common local sales and use tax reporting form;

Be accepted by all local governments; and

Be made available at all state and local sales and use tax reporting locations.

The executive director of the department of revenue shall cooperate with and assist local governments in the development of a uniform local government sales and use tax license application form. Any uniform local government sales and use tax license application form developed shall be made available at all state and local sales and use tax reporting locations.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (9) notwithstanding, in addition to the standard sales and use tax form set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (9), the common local sales and use tax form developed pursuant to this paragraph (d) may be used by a person collecting the sales or use tax of any city, home rule city, town, city and county, or other political subdivision of the state which collects its own sales or use tax.

Delayed distributions.

If any sales tax to be distributed pursuant to this section is not distributed within sixty days after the processing date, interest shall be added to the undistributed amount from the sixtieth day after the processing date until the date such sales tax is distributed. The rate of said interest shall be equal to the average rate, rounded to one-thousandth of a percent, being earned by the investment of moneys in the state treasury for the same period.

The provisions of this subsection (10) shall apply only to sales tax collected by the department of revenue with a processing date occurring on or after January 1, 2001. The provisions of this subsection (10) shall not apply in the event that the distribution of sales tax was delayed as a result of unforseen circumstances or caused primarily by an entity other than the department of revenue. Such determination shall be made in good faith by the department.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 662, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 138-10-6.

L. 71:

p. 1267, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 1478, § 3.

L. 75:

(3)(a) amended, p. 963, § 5, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(4) amended, p. 1400, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 79:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1430, § 14, effective July 3.

L. 80:

(2) amended, p. 728, § 26, effective May 1; (4)(a) amended, p. 735, § 5, effective May 2.

L. 81:

(3)(b) amended, p. 1404, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(7) added, p. 460, § 1, effective March 11.

L. 85:

(8) and (9) added, p. 1031, § 2, effective January 1, 1986.

L. 90:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1746, § 2, effective May 8.

L. 94:

(9)(d) added, p. 1314, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 97:

(9)(d)(I) and (9)(d)(III) amended, p. 527, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(4)(a) amended, p. 981, § 4, effective May 28; (4)(a) amended, p. 1276, § 4, effective July 1; (4)(a) amended, p. 1326, § 6, effective July 1; (3)(c) added, p. 13, § 5, effective January 1, 2000; (4)(a) amended, p. 1357, § 5, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2000:

(4)(a) amended, p. 552, § 6, effective July 1; (4)(b) amended and (10) added, p. 421, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

(4)(a) amended, p. 163, § 3, effective July 1; (4)(a) amended, p. 384, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1036, § 82, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1038, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(4)(a) R&RE, p. 1322, § 6, effective May 27; (4)(a) R&RE, p. 1546, § 4, effective May 28; (4)(a) R&RE, p. 968, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1130), ch. 229, p. 1042, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1295), ch. 314, p. 1655, § 10, effective see editor's note.

L. 2016:

(8) amended, (SB 16-036), ch. 292, p. 1182, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

(4)(c)(I) and (6) amended, (SB 22-032), ch. 119, p. 556, § 2, effective April 21; (3)(c)(II) amended, (HB 22-1312), ch. 202, p. 1359, § 1, effective August 10.

29-2-106.1. Deficiency notice - dispute resolution.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the enforcement of sales and use taxes can affect persons and entities across the jurisdictional boundaries of taxing jurisdictions and that dispute resolution is a matter of statewide concern for which the procedures set forth in this section shall be applied uniformly throughout the state.

When a local government asserts that sales or use taxes are due in an amount greater than the amount paid by a taxpayer, such local government shall mail a deficiency notice to the taxpayer by certified mail. The deficiency notice shall state the additional local sales and use taxes due. The deficiency notice shall contain notification, in clear and conspicuous type, of the time limit to file a protest to the notice and that the taxpayer has the right to elect a hearing on the deficiency pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Any protest to the deficiency notice shall be filed with the local government within thirty days after the date of the notice.

The taxpayer shall also have the right to elect a hearing pursuant to subsection (3) of this section on a local government's denial of such taxpayer's claim for a refund of sales or use tax paid.

The taxpayer shall request the hearing pursuant to subsection (3) of this section within thirty days after the taxpayer's exhaustion of local remedies. For purposes of this paragraph (c), "exhaustion of local remedies" means that one of the following events has occurred:

The taxpayer has timely requested in writing a hearing before the local government, and such local government has held such hearing and issued a final decision thereon. Such hearing, if any, shall be held and any decision thereon issued within one hundred eighty days after the taxpayer's request in writing therefor or within such further time as the taxpayer and local government may agree upon in writing.

The taxpayer and local government agree in writing that no hearing before the local government will be held, or that no final decision will issue from the local government. Such written agreement shall state that the taxpayer exhausted local remedies in accordance with this section, shall identify the date of such exhaustion, and shall advise the taxpayer of the right to pursue further review pursuant to subsection (3) or (8) of this section within thirty days after such exhaustion.

One hundred eighty days or more after the date of the taxpayer's request for a hearing, the local government notifies the taxpayer in writing that the local government does not intend to conduct a hearing. In such instance, the written notification shall also state that the taxpayer exhausted local remedies in accordance with this section, that such exhaustion occurred on the date of the written notification, and that the taxpayer may pursue further review pursuant to subsection (3) or (8) of this section within thirty days after such exhaustion.

In the event the taxpayer has timely requested in writing a hearing before the local government and none of the events described in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2) have occurred, the taxpayer may request a hearing pursuant to subsection (3) of this section at any time after the period prescribed in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (c) of this subsection (2).

Any hearing before a local government shall be informal and no transcript, rules of evidence, or filing of briefs shall be required; but the taxpayer may elect to submit a brief, in which case the local government may submit a brief.

If a taxpayer satisfies the requirements of paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, the taxpayer may request the executive director of the department of revenue to conduct a hearing on such deficiency notice or claim for refund, and such request shall be made and such hearing shall be conducted in the same manner as set forth in section 39-21-103, C.R.S. Any local government to which the deficiency notice being appealed claims taxes are due, or, in the case of a claim for refund, the local government that denied such claim, shall be notified by the executive director that a hearing is scheduled and shall be allowed to participate in the hearing as a party.

If the taxpayer requests a hearing before the executive director, then the local government whose decision is being appealed may not require a bond or payment of tax in lieu thereof; but such local government may require a bond or payment of tax in lieu thereof filed with and payable to the local government in the manner provided in section 39-21-111, C.R.S., prior to the hearing before such local government or the executive director if either such local government reasonably finds that collection of the tax will be jeopardized by delay or the taxpayer requests a postponement of the hearing before such local government or the executive director, other than on account of a death, physical illness or injury, or catastrophe, which substantially impairs the taxpayer's ability to present his case. In the event that payment of the tax or posting of a bond is required by the local government, the taxpayer, after payment of the tax or posting of the bond, may appeal such decision of the local government to the executive director and shall be granted an expedited hearing on such appeal pursuant to section 39-21-103 (6), C.R.S., and the executive director may affirm, reverse, or modify such decision.

If the taxpayer appeals the decision issued pursuant to this subsection (3) in the manner provided in section 39-21-105, C.R.S., then the taxpayer shall pay the tax to or post a bond with the local government whose decision is being appealed in the manner provided in that section.

Any hearings before the executive director of the department of revenue or his delegate shall be de novo, without regard to the decision of the local government. The taxpayer shall have the burden of proof in any such hearings.

In the event that all parties to a hearing arrive at a settlement prior to the hearing, such parties may agree to cancel such hearing. No party shall thereafter have a right to a hearing before the executive director on the deficiency notice or claim for refund. By agreement of all parties to the hearing, the hearing may be canceled and the matter may be determined by the executive director upon written briefs submitted by the parties in the same manner as provided in section 39-21-103 (7) and (8), C.R.S.

If the taxpayer asserts that all or part of a sales or use tax which is the subject of the hearing has been paid to or is due to another local government, then such other local government shall be joined as a party to the hearing. Neither the taxpayer nor the assessing local government needs to file a claim for refund with such other local government in order to pursue the remedy provided by this subsection (5)(a). If the executive director determines that the disputed tax was paid, but to the wrong local government, then the taxpayer shall be relieved of the tax due up to the amount paid by the taxpayer to the wrong local government together with an abatement of interest thereon and all penalties.

Notwithstanding section 29-2-106 (8), the periods open or closed to assessment or refund under the ordinances of the local governments, under sections 39-26-210, 39-21-107 (1), 39-26-125, and 39-26-703, or under an intergovernmental transfer agreement may not bar any of the remedies set forth in subsections (5)(a) and (6) of this section.

For any taxable event occurring on or after January 1, 2018, if the taxpayer receives a notice from a local government that the taxpayer must pay sales or use tax to that local government for a particular taxable event and the taxpayer fails to comply with the instructions in the notice with respect to the same type of taxable event that occurs more than ninety days after the taxpayer receives the notice, then the taxpayer may not take advantage of the remedy allowed in subsection (5)(a) of this section for that particular type of taxable event identified in the notice that occurs more than ninety days after the taxpayer received the notice, unless the taxpayer receives, or has previously received, a similar notice described in subsection (5)(c)(II) of this section from another local government that provides contrary instructions.

The notice required in subsection (5)(c)(I) of this section must:

Be in writing and be signed by an appropriate local government official;

Be sent by certified or registered mail or be delivered by a nationally recognized courier service that provides a receipt upon delivery;

Instruct the taxpayer to pay sales or use tax on the particular type of taxable event identified in the notice to the local government; and

Include notice that failure to comply with the instructions will result in the taxpayer being denied the remedy allowed in subsection (5)(a) of this section for the particular type of taxable event identified in the notice that occurs more than ninety days after the taxpayer received the notice.

If the amount paid exceeds the tax found to be due, then the government in receipt of such payment shall refund the overpayment to the taxpayer within thirty days of the executive director's decision, together with interest thereon from the date the taxpayer made the payment until the date the overpayment is refunded, unless a timely appeal is taken by such government pursuant to subsection (7) of this section. If the amount paid is found to be less than the taxes due, then the taxpayer shall pay the deficiency, less any amount paid in lieu of bond, to the appropriate local government within thirty days of the executive director's decision with interest from the date full payment was due until the date that the deficiency is paid, unless a timely appeal is taken by the taxpayer pursuant to subsection (7) of this section. A local government which is found to have erroneously received payment from the taxpayer shall forward such payment to the appropriate local government within thirty days of the executive director's decision with interest from the date the amount was received from the taxpayer until the date the amount was forwarded to the appropriate local government, unless a timely appeal is taken pursuant to subsection (7) of this section by a local government which is found to have erroneously received payment from the taxpayer. All interest payable pursuant to this subsection (6) shall be at the same rate which applies to deficiency payments.

Appeals from the final determination of the executive director may be taken in the same manner as provided in and shall be governed by section 39-21-105, C.R.S., by any party bound by the executive director's decision. Any such appeal shall be heard de novo and shall be heard as provided in section 39-21-105, C.R.S., except as follows: If the appellant is a local government, the taxpayer shall have the burden of proof as to all factual matters, and the appellant shall have the burden with respect to any legal determination of the executive director of the department of revenue which the appellant seeks to reverse; except that the local government shall always have the burden of proof with respect to the issue of whether the taxpayer has been guilty of fraud with intent to evade tax and with respect to the issue of whether the taxpayer is liable as a transferee of property of another taxpayer, but not to show that the transferor taxpayer was liable for the tax; and except that the executive director may, at his request, be a party to any such appeal.

If a deficiency notice or claim for refund involves only one local government, in lieu of requesting a hearing pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the taxpayer may appeal such deficiency or denial of a claim for refund to the district court.

The taxpayer shall appeal to the district court pursuant to this subsection (8) within thirty days after the taxpayer's exhaustion of local remedies. For purposes of this subsection (8), "exhaustion of local remedies" means that one of the following events has occurred:

The taxpayer has timely requested in writing a hearing before the local government, and such local government has held such hearing and issued a final decision thereon. Such hearing shall be informal and no transcript, rules of evidence, or filing of briefs shall be required; but the taxpayer may elect to submit a brief, in which case the local government may submit a brief. Such hearing, if any, shall be held and any decision thereon issued within one hundred eighty days of the taxpayer's request in writing therefor or within such further time as the taxpayer and local government may agree upon in writing.

The taxpayer and local government agree in writing that no hearing before the local government will be held or that no final decision will issue from the local government. Such written agreement shall state that the taxpayer exhausted local remedies in accordance with this section, shall identify the date of such exhaustion, and shall advise the taxpayer of the right to pursue further review pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or this subsection (8) within thirty days after such exhaustion.

One hundred eighty days or more after the date of the taxpayer's request for a hearing, the local government notifies the taxpayer in writing that the local government does not intend to conduct a hearing. In such instance, the written notification shall also state that the taxpayer exhausted local remedies in accordance with this section, that such exhaustion occurred on the date of the written notification, and that the taxpayer may pursue further review pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or this subsection (8) within thirty days after such exhaustion.

In the event the taxpayer has timely requested in writing a hearing before the local government and none of the events described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (8) have occurred, the taxpayer may appeal such deficiency or denial of a claim for refund to the district court at any time after the period prescribed in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (8).

An appeal pursuant to this subsection (8) must be conducted in the same manner as provided in section 39-21-105, C.R.S.; except that venue is in the district court of the county where the local government whose decision is being appealed is located, and any deposit made pursuant to section 39-21-105 (4), (5), or (8)(a)(III), C.R.S., must be made with the local government whose decision is being appealed.

In lieu of electing a hearing pursuant to this section on a notice of deficiency or claim for refund, a taxpayer may pursue judicial review of a local government's final decision thereon as otherwise provided in such local government's ordinance.

As used in this section, "local government" means home rule and statutory cities, towns, cities and counties, and counties.

If any local government which collects its own sales or use tax to which the deficiency notice claims taxes are due reasonably finds that the collection of the tax will be jeopardized by delay, it may utilize the procedures set forth in section 39-21-111, C.R.S.; however, utilization of such procedures shall not preclude the taxpayer from appealing to the executive director pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1032, § 3, effective January 1, 1996.

L. 2010:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 10-142), ch. 51, p. 194, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(2)(c), (3)(a), and (8) amended and (2)(d) and (2)(e) added, (SB 11-086), ch. 52, p. 135, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(8)(d) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1692, § 90, effective August 7.

L. 2016:

(3)(b), (3)(c), and (8)(d) amended, (SB 16-036), ch. 292, p. 1182, § 4, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(5) amended, (SB 17-112), ch. 144, p. 482, § 1, effective April 18.

29-2-106.2. Location guides - precinct locators.

Each home rule city, town, and city and county collecting its own sales or use tax shall make available to any requesting vendor a map or other location guide showing the boundaries of the municipality. The requesting vendor may rely on the map or other location guide and any update thereof available to the vendor in determining whether to collect a sales or use tax, or both, of the municipality. No penalty shall be imposed or action for deficiency maintained if the requesting vendor in good faith complies with the most recent map or other location guide available to it.

As used in this subsection (2), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Local taxing entity" means a home rule or statutory municipality, county, city and county, or any other local governmental entity that imposes a sales or use tax.

"Precinct locator" means the record regularly maintained by a county clerk and recorder and used to determine within which jurisdiction or jurisdictions an address is located for voting purposes and, for determining the location of commercial or industrial addresses, shall include the record regularly maintained by the county clerk and recorder and used to determine within which jurisdiction or jurisdictions an address is located for the purpose of properly remitting sales or use tax on motor vehicles.

Any public utility may rely upon the precinct locator maintained by the county clerk and recorder for the county or counties in which a local taxing entity is located in determining whether to collect a sales or use tax, or both, of the local taxing entity.

No penalty shall be imposed upon, interest charged to, or action for deficiency maintained against a public utility in connection with the collection of a sales or use tax, or both, by the public utility if, in determining whether to collect the tax, the public utility relied in good faith upon the most recently updated version of a precinct locator in existence at the time of the taxable transaction. The provisions of this paragraph (c) shall not apply to the extent that the local entity has informed the public utility in writing prior to a taxable transaction that the most recently updated version of the precinct locator is inaccurate and, in such writing, provides the public utility with a corrected copy of the precinct locator information.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1032, § 3, effective January 1, 1986.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 555, § 1, effective April 24.

29-2-107. Limitation on applicability.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to apply to, affect, or limit the powers of home rule municipalities organized under article XX of the state constitution to impose, administer, or enforce any local sales or use tax except those provisions which specifically refer to "home rule".

No provision of this article shall be construed to require any incorporated town or city or any county to impose any sales tax or to increase any sales tax imposed prior to July 1, 1967.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to invalidate any sales or use tax adopted by ordinance or resolution by any town, city, city and county, or county, whether home rule or statutory, prior to January 1, 1986. Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, no sales or use tax of any such local government shall conflict with the provisions of this article after January 1, 1986.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 663, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 138-10-7.

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1036, § 4, effective January 1, 1986.

29-2-108. Limitation on amount. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 67:

p. 663, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 138-10-8.

L. 73:

p. 1479, § 4.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1402, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1519, § 5, effective March 22; (3) added, p. 917, § 3, effective April 28; (2) amended, p. 2098, § 8, effective October 13.

L. 84:

(2) amended, p. 1141, § 2, effective June 7.

L. 86:

(2) repealed, p. 1220, § 28, effective May 30.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 1206, § 2, effective May 6; (3) amended, p. 1215, § 12, effective May 7; (3) amended, p. 987, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(4) added, p. 1441, § 2, effective May 4.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 1982, § 3, effective April 20.

L. 97:

(5) added, p. 1424, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1430, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2001:

(3) amended, p. 1275, § 40, effective June 5; (3) amended, p. 973, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(6) and (7) added, p. 1944, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 884, § 6, effective August 6; (3) amended, p. 2475, § 30, effective August 15.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 1931, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 1043, § 6, effective June 2.

L. 2007:

(5.5) added, p. 305, § 1, effective March 30; (3) amended, p. 430, § 3, effective April 9; (3) amended, p. 584, § 1, effective April 19; (3) amended, p. 1201, § 17, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1460, § 3, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 988, § 1, effective August 5.